Mississippi, session 2026, HB557.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 83-41-218, Mississippi Code of 1972: 83-41-218.  Under each policy of insurance or a medical service plan or hospital service contract or hospital and medical service contract issued or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2027, an insurer or third-party administrator for an insurer must provide reimbursement to a pharmacist for a service or procedure at a rate not less than that provided to any other nonphysician health care provider if the service or procedure: (a)  Is within the scope of practice of a pharmacist as defined in Section 73-21-73; and (b)  Otherwise would be covered under the policy, plan or contract if provided by any health care service provider or other person. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.